Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Local Government Economic Assistance Program
42.4588.
Local Government Economic Development Program — Use of grants — Procedures.

A Local Government Economic Development Program is established to consist of a system of grants to counties to attract new industry. Grants from funds provided for in KRS 42.4592(1)(a) and (b) shall be administered by the Department for Local Government. Grants from funds provided for in KRS 42.4592(1)(c) shall be administered by the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.

All references in this section to the commissioner of the Department for Local Government relate only to the grants or industrial development projects funded through KRS 42.4592(1)(a) and (b). All references in this section to the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development or the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority relate only to grants or industrial development projects funded through KRS 42.4592(1)(c).

Grants obtained under this program shall be used for:

Industrial development projects if an industrial firm has agreed with the local government, to the satisfaction of the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority or the Department for Local Government, to develop, in conjunction with the industrial development project, manufacturing, processing, assembling, or other facilities approved by the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development or the commissioner of the Department for Local Government;

Industrial development projects if the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development or the commissioner of the Department for Local Government finds that the project is necessary for the creation of an environment for new industry in order to obtain an agreement from an industrial firm to develop manufacturing, processing, assembling, or other facilities approved by the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development or the commissioner of the Department for Local Government; and

Debt service for industrial development projects, as defined in subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section, or for facilities approved by the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development or the commissioner of the Department for Local Government under the provisions of subsection (3) of this section.

The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development or the commissioner of the Department for Local Government may approve facilities, other than manufacturing, processing, or assembling facilities, for industrial development projects when the secretary or the commissioner finds that the facility will add value to a product. Value-added facilities shall include data processing, telecommunication, and distribution facilities but shall not include retail facilities or coal mining, coal processing, or coal transportation facilities. The secretary or the commissioner may also approve privately owned facilities for transient lodging and recreation where the secretary or commissioner finds that the cost of the recreation component of the facility is equal to, or greater than, the cost of the lodging component of the facility. The criteria for approval of applications for grants provided for in subsection (10)(a), (b), and (c) of this section shall be paramount in the case of lodging and recreational facilities.

Applications for grants from funds provided for in KRS 42.4592(1)(a) and (b) shall be made by the legislative bodies of one (1) or more counties with accounts in the local government economic development fund. Applications for grants from funds provided for in KRS 42.4592(1)(c) shall be made by the legislative bodies of two (2) or more counties with accounts in the local government economic development fund. No grant shall be awarded without application for a grant.

A grant may be awarded for an industrial development project located in a county that does not have an account in the local government economic development fund, if the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development or the commissioner of the Department for Local Government finds that the industrial development project may be reasonably expected to create jobs for residents of the local unit or units of government applying for the grant. Application for the grant shall be made by the legislative bodies of one (1) or more counties with accounts in the local government economic development fund.

An industrial development project may include legal, accounting, engineering, and marketing expenses for a regional industrial park, in addition to the activities set forth in subsection (11)(a) of this section.

Grants awarded from funds provided for in KRS 42.4592(1)(a) and (b) shall not exceed the total balance of the accounts of the applicant counties at the time of the award of the grant.

Grants awarded under the provisions of subsection (2)(c) of this section may be for a period not to exceed the current biennium of the Commonwealth and shall be limited to an amount not to exceed the amount estimated to be allocated to the applicant county or counties for the current biennium under the provisions of KRS 42.4592(1)(a) and (b).

Approval of grant applications shall be by the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development or the commissioner of the Department for Local Government. Award of grants from funds provided for in KRS 42.4592(1)(c) shall be by the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority. Award of grants from funds provided for in KRS 42.4592(1)(a) and (b) shall be by the commissioner of the Department for Local Government.

Criteria for approval of applications and the award of grants to be considered, if applicable, shall include:

The number of jobs to be created or preserved, directly or indirectly, by the industrial development project;

Payrolls, and the taxes generated, both at the state and local levels, by the industrial development project and taxes generated by the employment created or preserved by the industrial development project;

The size, nature, and cost of the industrial development project, including the prospect of the industrial development project providing long-term jobs in enterprises consistent with the changing economies of the affected local units of government;

The needs, and degree of needs, of the local units of government which will be affected by the industrial development project;

The needs of any industrial firm benefiting from the industrial development project;

The amount and kind of assistance, if any, available to an industrial firm from other government agencies through tax exemption or abatement, financing assistance through industrial development bonds, and otherwise, with respect to the industrial development project;

The amount of capital made available to the facility by lenders and by the industrial firm; and

The economic feasibility of the facility.

For purposes of this section:

“Industrial development project” includes the acquisition of any real estate and the construction, acquisition, and installation thereon and with respect thereto of improvements and facilities necessary and useful for the improvement of the real estate for conveyance to or lease to industrial firms to be used for manufacturing, processing, or assembling purposes, including surveys; site tests and inspections; subsurface site work; excavation, removal of structures, roadways, cemeteries, and other surface obstructions; filling, grading, and provision of drainage; storm water retention; installation of utilities, such as water, sewer, sewage treatment, gas, electricity, communication, and other similar facilities; off-site construction of utility extensions to the boundaries of the real estate; construction and installation on the real estate of the industrial firm of buildings, including buildings to be used for worker training and education; rail facilities; roads; sidewalks; curbs; other improvements to the real estate necessary to its manufacturing, processing, assembling, or other approved use by industrial entities; workforce training; and job development incentive grants;

“Industrial firm” means any corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, partnership, person, or other legal entity, whether domestic or foreign, which will itself or through its subsidiaries and affiliates construct and develop a manufacturing, processing, assembling, or other approved facility on the site of an industrial development project financed pursuant to this section;

“Job development incentive grant” means an award to a county of funds from its account administered by the Department for Local Government pursuant to KRS 42.4592(1)(a) and (b) for the use by the county to encourage job development for those industrial development projects located in that county which create at least twenty-five (25) new full-time jobs held by Kentucky residents who receive a minimum wage of at least one hundred thirty percent (130%) of the federal minimum wage. Each job development incentive grant shall be limited to five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each job created which fulfills the requirements of this subsection. The industrial firm receiving the job development incentive grant shall pay its employees at the project site an average wage equal to or greater than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage and shall invest at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per new job created. After a fiscal court has received authorization for the job development grant by the Department for Local Government, the county, the industrial firm, and the Department for Local Government shall enter into an agreement committing the grant funds to be disbursed at such time as the industrial firm certifies the authenticity of the following information to be delivered to the county:

The industrial firm has made at least the minimum investment required;

At least twenty-five (25) new full-time Kentucky jobs have been created at the project site by the industrial firm;

No employee at the project site is paid a salary by the industrial firm which is less than one hundred thirty percent (130%) of the federal minimum wage;

The employees at the project site are paid an average wage by the industrial firm at least equal to one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage;

Each employee hired for the project by the industrial firm shall have worked on a full-time basis at the minimum wages described in this section at least twelve (12) full consecutive months at the site prior to any grant funds disbursement; and

No job created by the industrial firm after twenty-four (24) months from the date of the first eligible hire at the project site shall be considered for the grant.

If the county is satisfied the information provided is accurate and qualifies the industrial firm for the job development incentive grant as described in the agreement, it shall forward the certified information to the Department for Local Government, which shall make the job development grant disbursement upon sufficient evidence that all terms of the agreement have been met; and

“Regional industrial park” means an industrial development project authorized for a grant award by the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority for a minimum of three (3) counties eligible for grant funds provided for in KRS 42.4592(1)(c), which coalition may include a county as approved under subsection (5) of this section.

Findings by the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development or the commissioner of the Department for Local Government, provided for in subsections (2)(b), (3), and (5) of this section, shall be made in writing to the affected counties, the Governor, and the Legislative Research Commission.

By October 1 of each odd-numbered year, the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development and the commissioner of the Department for Local Government shall each provide, in writing, to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission a listing of all applications for grants received pursuant to this section subsequent to the last report, indicating which applications were approved or disapproved, with the reason for disapproval when the decision was to disapprove, and a listing of all grants awarded, with the amount of the award, the recipient county, and the related industrial development project.

Projects specifically authorized by appropriations made by the General Assembly in an enacted budget bill, with the funding source identified as funds allocated to individual counties under KRS 42.4592(1)(a) or (b), shall be deemed approved and shall not be subject to the application process established in this section.

Projects described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be subject to a memorandum of agreement between the entity identified in the appropriation and the Department for Local Government. The memorandum of agreement shall address the legal requirements for the disbursement and accounting of funds.

Within thirty (30) days of the receipt of a written request from an entity designated in the appropriation for funding related to a project described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the Department for Local Government shall prepare and send a memorandum of agreement to the designated entity for review and signature. Upon receipt of the signed memorandum of agreement from the designated entity, the Department for Local Government shall release the funds for the project for use by the designated entity.

Funds appropriated for specific projects as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be expended for any other purpose, provided that the commissioner of the Department for Local Government may, upon written request by a designated entity identifying an extraordinary circumstance or emergency situation, approve the reallocation of funds appropriated for a specific project as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection to the extent necessary to address the extraordinary circumstance or emergency situation. Any approval under this paragraph shall be made in writing, and shall be reported to the State Budget Director and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue within thirty (30) days of the approval being made.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 107, § 6, effective July 1, 1992; 1994, ch. 18, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 499, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 170, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 300, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 34, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 338, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 210, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 47, § 19, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 123, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 117, § 25, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2008). 2008 Ky. Acts chs. 123, sec. 2 provides that amendments made to this section by that Act “shall apply to projects beginning with those authorized in the 2008-2010 biennial budget.”

(6/21/2001). A reference to “subsection (9)” in subsection (3) of this statute has been changed in codification to “subsection (10)” under KRS 7.136(1)(e) and (h). In 2000 Ky. Acts ch. 300, sec. 1, the existing subsection (9) was renumbered as subection (10), but an internal reference to that subsection in the existing language of this statute was overlooked.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

42.4592.
Allocation of remaining moneys in local government economic development fund.

Moneys remaining in the local government economic development fund following the transfer of moneys to the local government economic assistance fund provided for in KRS

42.4585

shall be allocated as follows:

Thirty-three and one-third percent (33-1/3%) shall be allocated to each coal producing county on the basis of the ratio of total coal severed in the current and preceding four (4) years in each respective county to the total coal severed statewide in the current and four (4) preceding years;

Thirty-three and one-third percent (33-1/3%) shall be allocated quarterly to each coal-producing county on the basis of the following factors, which shall be computed for the current and four (4) preceding years, and which shall be equally weighted:

Percentage of employment in mining in relation to total employment in the respective county;

Percentage of earnings from mining in relation to total earnings in the respective county; and

Surplus labor rate; and

Thirty-three and one-third percent (33-1/3%) shall be reserved for expenditure for industrial development projects benefiting two (2) or more coal-producing counties. For purposes of this paragraph, “coal-producing county” shall mean a county which has produced coal in the current or any one of the four (4) preceding years.

For purposes of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section, “percentage of employment in mining” and “percentage of earnings from mining” shall be provided by the Department of Workforce Development in the Education and Labor Cabinet, and “surplus labor rate” shall be the rate published for the latest available five (5) year period by the Department of Workforce Development as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.

Each year the Department of Workforce Development shall estimate surplus labor for each county and for the Commonwealth and shall annually publish an estimate of the surplus labor rate for each county and the Commonwealth.

The estimate of surplus labor for each county and for the Commonwealth shall be made using the best practical method available at the time the estimates are made. In determining the method to be adopted, the Department of Workforce Development may consult with knowledgeable individuals, including but not limited to the Office of the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, state and national researchers, state and local officials, and staff of the Legislative Research Commission. The description of the method used to estimate surplus labor shall be reported in each annual publication provided for in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.

For purposes of this section, “surplus labor” means the total number of residents who can be classified as unemployed or as discouraged workers, and “surplus labor rate” means the percentage of the potential civilian labor force which is surplus labor.

The funds allocated under the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) of this section shall retain their identity with respect to the county to which they are attributable, and a separate accounting of available moneys within the fund shall be maintained for the respective counties. Accounting for funds allocated under the provisions of this section shall be by the Department for Local Government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 107, § 7, effective July 1, 1992; 1994, ch. 224, § 16, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 271, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 69, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 211, § 10, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 47, § 20, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 11, § 8, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 117, § 26, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 49, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 110, § 3, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 146, § 5, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 236, § 17, effective July 1, 2022.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (10) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (3) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

42.4595.
Authority for administrative regulations.

The Department for Local Government may promulgate administrative regulations to implement the provisions of KRS

42.4582

,

42.4585

,

42.4592

, and KRS

42.4588

as it relates to KRS

42.4592

(1)(a) and (b). The Cabinet for Economic Development or the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority may promulgate administrative regulations to implement the provisions of KRS

42.4588

as it relates to KRS 42.4592(1)(c).

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 107, § 8, effective July 1, 1992; 1994, ch. 499, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 69, § 12, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 34, § 3, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 338, § 45, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 210, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 47, § 21, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 27, effective July 15, 2010.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (10) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

42.460.
Independent annual audit and certification of compliance — Exception.

Except as provided in KRS 91A.040(7)(b), any assistance granted under KRS

42.450

to

42.495

shall include an agreement that an independent annual audit shall be conducted and that the audit report shall include a certification that the funds were expended for the purpose intended. A copy of the audit and certification of compliance shall be forwarded to the Department for Local Government, in the case of assistance granted from the local government economic assistance fund or the local government economic development fund as allocated in KRS 42.4592(1)(a) and (b), or to the Cabinet for Economic Development and the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority, in the case of assistance granted from the local government economic development fund, within eighteen (18) months after the end of the fiscal year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 394, § 3, effective July 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 393, § 30, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 374, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 52, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 107, § 9, effective July 1, 1992; 1994, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 69, § 13, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 34, § 4, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 338, § 46, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 210, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 47, § 22, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 28, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 10, § 3, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 91, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (10) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

42.465.
Approval of assistance.

No assistance shall be approved in excess of funds received and transferred to the account of any respective unit of government, and no assistance shall be approved for a unit of government failing to submit the certification of compliance required in KRS

42.460

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 394, § 4, effective July 1, 1980.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (10) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

42.470.
Allocation of funds among counties — Limitation of reduction of funds to counties and their incorporated areas.

Moneys in the local government economic assistance fund shall be allocated among the counties as follows:

Funds allocated under KRS

42.4585

:

Sixty percent (60%) shall be distributed to each coal producing county on the basis of the ratio of coal severed in each respective county to the coal severed statewide.

Thirty percent (30%) shall be distributed to each coal producing county on the basis of per capita income (inverse order), ton miles of resource roads and population, equally weighted.

Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed to non-coal producing counties impacted by the transport of coal on the basis of geographic area, ton miles of resource roads, and per capita income (inverse order), weighted on a basis of 30/100, 40/100, and 30/100, respectively. The expenditure of such funds shall be limited to the categories of projects set out in KRS 42.455(2)(c). All counties shall receive an annual payment based on the average of total ton miles within the county during the most recent three (3) year period. To qualify for the funds distributed under the provisions of this paragraph, a county must have within its geographic boundaries in any single year twenty-five hundredths of one percent (0.25%) of the total ton miles within coal impact counties during the most recent three (3) year period.

All funds allocated under KRS 42.450(2) shall be distributed among the mineral producing counties on the basis of the tax collected on minerals severed in each respective county.

In no event shall the amount of funds distributed to a mineral producing county, and to the incorporated areas within that county under KRS

42.475

, in any given quarter be reduced by greater than fifty percent (50%) as a result of any refund of the tax imposed on the severance and processing of minerals. If a refund of tax occurs and a county’s allocated share of the refund amount is greater than fifty percent (50%) of the quarterly distribution due that county and its incorporated areas, the remainder shall carry forward to be offset in successive quarters as necessary until it is satisfied in full.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 394, § 5, effective July 1, 1980; 1992, ch. 107, § 3, effective July 1, 1992; 1994, ch. 488, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 2016 ch. 110, § 4, effective July 1, 2016.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 10, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (10) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

42.472.
Use of tar sands moneys by counties.

Moneys from tar sands distributed to counties under KRS 42.470(2) shall be used for economic development purposes as approved by the Department for Local Government.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 367, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 47, § 23, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 29, effective July 15, 2010.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (10) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

42.475.
Allocation of funds to incorporated areas — Allocation to counties.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, ten percent (10%) of the funds allocated to each county under the provisions of KRS

42.470

shall be allotted to the incorporated areas within the county based on the ratio that the population of each incorporated area bears to the total population of all the incorporated areas within the county; except that incorporated areas shall not be eligible for funds allocated to counties under the provisions of KRS

42.490

and 1980 Acts, ch. 394, sec. 11.

If the amount of funds to be allotted to an incorporated area under subsection (1) of this section is less than twenty-five dollars ($25) in any given quarter, then the allotment shall not be made and the applicable funds shall instead be distributed to the county to which they were allocated under KRS

42.470

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 394, § 6, effective July 1, 1980; 2016 ch. 110, § 5, effective July 1, 2016.

Compiler's Notes.

Acts 1980, ch. 394, § 11, referred to herein, contained an appropriation for the fiscal year 1979-80.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (10) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

Opinions of Attorney General.

In applying the program to incorporated areas under this section the state is only required to determine whether the applicant exists as an incorporated city; it is not its duty to determine precisely what municipal functions are being carried on. The statute must be accepted and applied as it is written.

OAG 82-558

.

42.480.
Estimate of funds to be allocated — Remittance of funds.

On or before July 1, 1992, and each year thereafter, the commissioner of the Department for Local Government shall provide the Cabinet for Economic Development, the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority, and the legislative body of each local government eligible for funds under the provisions of KRS

42.450

to

42.495

, an estimate of the funds that will be allocated to the local government for fiscal year 1992-93, and each year thereafter.

On or before the fifteenth of the first month of a quarter, the commissioner of the Department for Local Government shall cause to be remitted to the legislative bodies of the local governments eligible for funds from the local government economic assistance fund, the funds allocated to the respective local governments for the prior quarter; except that the remittance for the last quarter of a fiscal year shall be made after the close of the fiscal year accounting records and shall be adjusted to provide the balance of the annual allocation due the local government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 394, § 7, effective July 1, 1980; 1986, ch. 374, § 7, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 107, § 10, effective July 1, 1992; 1994, ch. 499, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 69, § 14, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 34, § 5, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 338, § 47, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 47, § 24, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 30, effective July 15, 2010.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (10) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under the literal wording of this section, the allocating process of the Finance and Administration Cabinet cannot be properly and fairly applied except in terms of the cities actually in existence and eligible on or before July 1, 1981, or on or before July 1 of each year thereafter; thus the inevitable starting point in the whole program of allocation is the estimate of allocation to then existing eligible local governments. In this manner the actual schedule of payment to eligible local governments, under subsection (2) of this section, must be followed.

OAG 82-558

.

42.485.
Funds not to lapse.

Moneys in the local government economic assistance fund are hereby appropriated, and shall be treated as a continuing appropriation and shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 394, § 8, effective July 1, 1980.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (10) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

42.490.
Transfer of fund balances of county.

All unencumbered fund balances in each county’s account established under KRS

42.300

, and all unencumbered fund balances in each county’s account established under KRS

42.330

, and all unencumbered fund balances in each county’s account established under KRS

177.970

, shall be transferred to that county’s account established to implement the provisions of KRS

42.450

to

42.495

. Funds transferred may be used for those purposes authorized by KRS

42.450

to

42.495

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 394, § 9, effective July 1, 1980.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (10) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where this section transfers the coal haul road money from unencumbered fund balances under KRS

42.300

(repealed), KRS

42.330

(repealed) and KRS

177.970

(repealed) to the local government assistance fund under KRS

42.450

et seq. of a county which has no county road over which coal is being hauled, the county through the fiscal court can spend the funds on one or more of the priority categories listed under subsections 2(a) through 2(i) of KRS

42.455

including any county road under subsection 2(c) within the limits of KRS

178.010

, even though no coal is hauled over it.

OAG 81-15

.

42.495.
Effect of reduction of local general tax effort.

If a qualifying local government unit reduces its general tax effort for any fiscal year, below the level of fiscal year 1991-92, that governmental unit shall forfeit funds that would otherwise be available under the provisions of KRS

42.450

to

42.495

on a dollar-for-dollar basis.

For purposes of this section, “general tax effort” shall mean the total revenues raised in fiscal year 1991-92 from the levy of all of the taxing district’s taxes in fiscal year 1991-92. Taxes based upon the 1991 assessment of property shall be considered to be taxes levied and collected for fiscal year 1991-92.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 394, § 10, effective July 1, 1980; 1992, ch. 107, § 11, effective July 1, 1992.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (10) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The forfeiture of funds mentioned in this section can only apply to an eligible city which has exercised the General Assembly’s direction in KRS

92.280

and has engaged in a general tax effort, as defined in KRS 42.495(2).

OAG 82-558

.

Considering the literal wording of this section, any city incorporated as such after the fiscal year of 1979-80 and thus not having a general tax effort, as called for in the statute, does not come within the operative effect of the statute.

OAG 82-558

.